Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2936
Obligation; default; bond holder or trustee; powers.

(1) In the event of default, any bondholder or trustee may enforce any covenant through any mandamus, injunction, or other equitable proceeding, consistent with the bond proceedings.

(2) Any trustee may be empowered to receive and administer pledged revenue and ensure payment of debt service under the terms of a trust indenture.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 36.
July 18, 2026